Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-417
Suspend, defined.

Suspend shall mean to cause a temporary interruption of all rights and privileges of a license or permit or the renewal thereof.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 138.